Alabama, session 2026rs, HB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Sections 16-46B-1, 16-46B-2, and 16-46B-7,
12 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
13 "§16-46B-1
14 For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms
15 shall have the following meanings:
16 (1) BOARD. The State Board of Education.
17 (2) COMPUTER SCIENCE. The study of computers and
18 algorithmic processes, including their principles, their
19 hardware and software designs, their implementation, and their
20 impact on society, and their emerging technologies, including,
21 but not limited to, artificial intelligence. Content should
22 focus on teaching students how to create new technologies, not
23 simply how to use technology.
24 (3) COMPUTER SCIENCE COURSES AND CONTENT. Courses that
25 teach computer science either as a standalone course
26 implementation implemented in middle and high schools, or, for
27 elementary school, integrated into other content areas.
28 (4) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Education.
Page 1

(4) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Education.
HB329 Enrolled
29 (5) ELEMENTARY SCHOOL. Includes grades kindergarten to
30 six, inclusive.
31 (6) HIGH QUALITY PROFESSIONAL LEARNING. Professional
32 development activities that satisfy all of the following:
33 a. Clarify the conceptual foundations of computer
34 science.
35 b. Teach research-based practices, including hands-on
36 and inquiry-based learning.
37 c. Are intended for existing teachers, with or without
38 previous exposure to computer science.
39 (7) HIGH QUALITY PROFESSIONAL LEARNING PROVIDERS.
40 Institutions of higher education, nonprofits, or private
41 entities that have successfully designed, implemented, and
42 scaled high quality, evidence-based computer science
43 professional learning for teachers and recommended by the
44 superintendent and approved by the board.
45 (8) HIGH SCHOOL. Includes grades nine to 12, inclusive.
46 (9) MIDDLE SCHOOL. Includes grades seven and eight.
47 (10) PUBLIC SCHOOL. Includes public K-12 elementary
48 schools, middle schools, and high schools.
49 (11) SUPERINTENDENT. The State Superintendent of
50 Education."
51 "§16-46B-2
52 (a)(1) Beginning in the 2020-2021 school year, each
53 public high school shall offer at least one authentic computer
54 science course from a department-approved list.
55 (2) Beginning in the 2021-2022 school year, each public
56 middle school shall offer instruction in middle school
Page 2

middle school shall offer instruction in middle school
HB329 Enrolled
57 computer science courses approved by the department.
58 (3) Beginning in the 2022-2023 school year, each public
59 elementary school shall offer instruction on the basics of
60 computer science and computational thinking.
61 (b) A computer science course or instruction in
62 computer science offered by a public school shall satisfy all
63 of the following:
64 (1) Be of high quality, as defined by the department.
65 (2) Meet or exceed the standards and curriculum
66 requirements, as they relate to authentic computer science,
67 established by the board in the state course of study for
68 digital literacy and computer science pursuant to Section
69 16-35-4 and be on the approved list of computer science
70 courses.
71 (c) A computer science course offered by a public high
72 school should be offered through an in-person setting and
73 shall be offered as a virtual or distance learning course
74 option only when an in-person classroom setting is not
75 practicable. A rationale for using the virtual or distance
76 learning option shall be included in the annual report.
77 (d) Beginning with public school students who will
78 graduate during the 2031-2032 school year, the department
79 shall ensure that all approved computer science courses and
80 content that meet graduation requirements pursuant to Section
81 16-46B-7, shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in
82 the concepts of computer science as defined in Section
83 16-46B-1.
84 (e) The enforcement of this section shall comply with
Page 3

(e) The enforcement of this section shall comply with
HB329 Enrolled
85 Section 16-1-11.1."
86 "§16-46B-7
87 (a) Before June 30, 2020, and in accordance with
88 Section 16-35-4, the department shall identify approved
89 computer science courses that may fulfill one unit of academic
90 credit for any mathematics or science course for high school
91 graduation.
92 (b) Beginning with the graduating class of 2021, for
93 the purposes of high school graduation requirements and
94 satisfying mathematics or science freshman admission
95 requirements for a public institution of higher education
96 physically located in this state, as determined by the
97 institution of higher education, a computer science course
98 successfully completed under subsection (a) shall be
99 equivalent to either of the following:
100 (1) One mathematics course credit.
101 (2) One science course credit.
102 (c)(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2032, all
103 public school students shall demonstrate digital literacy by
104 earning at least one credit in a department-approved, high
105 school or college-level computer science course, or by
106 completing a department-approved course with embedded computer
107 science skills and experiences. The department shall develop
108 and publish a set of minimum standards that must be taught in
109 every course with embedded computer science skills and
110 experiences. The department shall publish a list of high
111 school or college-level computer science courses and courses
112 with embedded computer science skills and experiences that
Page 4

with embedded computer science skills and experiences that
HB329 Enrolled
113 have been approved and meet the minimum standards required.
114 This requirement shall not result in an increase in the number
115 of credits required for graduation.
116 (2) Each computer science credit earned may fulfill any
117 one of the following, as determined by the local
118 superintendent of education:
119 a. One mathematics course credit.
120 b. One science course credit.
121 c. One career and technical education course credit.
122 d. One elective credit.
123 (3) Mathematics course credits and science course
124 credits may only be replaced by department-approved computer
125 science courses if the public school student is earning a
126 general education diploma, which requires the completion of
127 both four mathematics course credits and four science course
128 credits.
129 (4) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year,
130 completion of a computer science course shall not count as a
131 college and career readiness indicator unless the course
132 satisfies the requirements of another college and career
133 readiness indicator, such as attaining career and technical
134 education completer status or earning a qualifying score on an
135 Advanced Placement exam."
136 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
137 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
HB329 Enrolled
138
139
140
141
142
143
144
145
146
147 ________________________________________________
148 Speaker of the House of Representatives
149
150
151
152 ________________________________________________
153 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
154
155
156 House of Representatives
157
158 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
159 was passed by the House 12-Feb-26, as amended.
160
161 John Treadwell
162 Clerk
163
164
165
166
167
168 Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed
169
170
171
Page 6